Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB890.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter CHAPTERS to read:CHAPTER 21AUNIFORM PARTITION OF HEIRS PROPERTY ACTSec.21A21. Short title of chapter.21A22. Definitions.21A23. Applicability and relation to other law.21A23.1. Right of first refusal required.21A24. Service and notice by posting.21A24.1. Settlement conference.21A25. Hearing officers.21A26. Determination of value.<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 21A27. Cotenant buyout.21A28. Partition alternatives.21A29. Considerations for partition in kind.21A30. Open-market sale, sealed bids or auction.21A31. Report of open-market sale.21A32. Uniformity of application and construction.21A33. Relation to Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act.§ 21A21. Short title of chapter.This chapter may be referred to as the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act.§ 21A22. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Ascendant." An individual who precedes another individual in lineage, in the direct line of ascent from the other individual."Collateral." An individual who is related to another individual under the law of intestate succession of this Commonwealth but who is not the other individual's ascendant or descendant."Cotenant." One of two or more individuals who together hold an ownership interest in real property as tenants in common."Descendant." An individual who follows another individual in lineage, in the direct line of descent from the other individual."Determination of value." A court order determining the fair market value of heirs property under section 21A26 (relating to determination of value) or 21A30 (relating to open-market sale, 20250SB0890PN1837 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sealed bids or auction) or adopting the valuation of the property agreed to by all cotenants."Heirs property." Real property held in tenancy in common which satisfies all of the following requirements as of the filing of a partition action:(1) There is no agreement in a record binding all the cotenants which governs the partition of the property.(2) One or more of the cotenants acquired an equitable interest in the property via testate or intestate succession or acquired the title from a relative, whether living or deceased.(3) Any of the following applies:(i) twenty percent or more of the interests are held by cotenants who are relatives;(ii) twenty percent or more of the interests are held by an individual who acquired title from a relative, whether living or deceased; or(iii) twenty percent or more of the cotenants are relatives."Partition by sale." A court-ordered sale of the entire heirs property, whether by auction, sealed bids or open-market sale conducted under section 21A30."Partition in kind." The division of heirs property into physically separated titled parcels."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Relative." An ascendant, descendant or collateral or an individual otherwise related to another individual by blood, marriage, adoption or law of this Commonwealth other than this 20250SB0890PN1837 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter.§ 21A23. Applicability and relation to other law.(a) Applicability.--This chapter applies to partition actions filed on or after the effective date of this section.(b) Determination.--In an action to partition real property, the court shall determine whether the property is heirs property. If the court determines that the property is heirs property, the property must be partitioned under this chapter unless all the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.(c) Supplementation.--This chapter supplements section 3534 (relating to distribution in kind) and, if an action is governed by this chapter, it replaces the provisions of section 3534 that are inconsistent with this chapter.§ 21A23.1. Right of first refusal required.When a cotenant receives a bona fide offer from a noncotenant to purchase a share or shares of an heir's property and the cotenant intends to accept or respond with a counteroffer, the cotenants who inherited their share or shares of the property or the cotenants who are relatives to those cotenants who inherited their share or shares of the property shall have the right to purchase the shares for the identical price, terms and conditions of the offer or counteroffer, with first priority to a cotenant who is in possession of the heir's property as their primary residence and second priority to a cotenant who otherwise utilizes the property.§ 21A24. Service and notice by posting.(a) Service of complaint.--This chapter does not limit or affect the method by which services of a complaint in a partition action may be made.(b) Notice and posting.--If the plaintiff in a partition 20250SB0890PN1837 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 action seeks an order of notice by publication and the court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not later than 10 days after the court's determination, shall post and maintain while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject of the action. The sign shall state that the action has commenced and identify the name and address of the court and the common designation by which the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.§ 21A24.1. Settlement conference.(a) Conference required.--In a partition action of heirs property, after service and notice under section 21A24 (relating to service and notice by posting) and before additional action is taken, the court shall hold a mandatory settlement conference within 60 days after the date of determination of heirs property under section 21A23(b) (relating to applicability and relation to other law), or on a date agreed to by the parties, for the purpose of holding settlement discussions.(b) Notice.--After an heirs property determination is made under section 21A23(b), the court shall promptly send a notice to parties advising them of the time and place of the settlement conference, the purpose of the conference and the requirements of this section. The notice shall be in a form prescribed by the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts or, at the discretion of the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts, the administrative judge of the judicial district in which the action is pending. The plaintiff in the partition action shall post a copy of the settlement conference notice in a conspicuous place on the property within 20 days of the date of the notice.20250SB0890PN1837 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Settlement conference.--The settlement conference may be adjourned or reconvened during the pendency of the partition action. At a conference held under this section, if the defendant is appearing pro se, the court shall advise the defendant of the nature of the action and the defendant's rights and responsibilities as a defendant.(d) Notice after failure to answer.--The following shall apply:(1) At the first settlement conference held under this section, if the defendant has not filed a responsive pleading, the court shall:(i) advise the defendant of the requirement to respond to the complaint;(ii) explain what is required to respond to a complaint in court;(iii) advise the defendant that the ability to contest the partition action and assert defenses may be lost if a response is not filed;(iv) set a deadline for any cotenants requesting partition by sale; and(v) provide information about available resources for legal assistance.(2) A defendant who appears at the settlement conference but fails to file a timely responsive pleading shall be presumed to have a reasonable excuse for the default and shall be permitted to serve and file a responsive pleading, without any substantive defenses deemed to have been waived, within 30 days of initial appearance at the settlement conference. The default shall be deemed vacated upon service and filing of an answer or other responsive pleading.20250SB0890PN1837 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Good faith negotiation required.--The plaintiffs and defendants shall negotiate in good faith to reach a mutually agreeable resolution, including, but not limited to, a tenancy in common agreement, a cotenant buyout and the allocation, mechanics and financing thereof or any other agreement or loss mitigation that is fair and reasonable considering the totality of factors.(f) Failure to reach resolution.--If the parties do not reach a mutually agreeable resolution, a judicial hearing officer or other staff designated by the court to oversee the settlement conference process shall make a report of findings of fact, conclusions of law and recommendations for relief to the court concerning any party's failure to negotiate in good faith under subsection (e). If the court determines a plaintiff has failed to negotiate in good faith, the court shall dismiss the partition action.(g) Abeyance allowed.--Motions submitted by a party to the action may be held in abeyance while the settlement conference process is ongoing, except for motions concerning:(1) a determination of the percentage interests, if any, owned by any alleged cotenant if the interests are in dispute; and(2) compliance with this section, including applications to extend deadlines specified in this section.§ 21A25. Hearing officers.If the court appoints hearing officers under Pa.R.C.P. No. 1558 (relating to preliminary conference appointment of hearing officer), each hearing officer, in addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to hearing officers, must be disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a participant 20250SB0890PN1837 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the action.§ 21A26. Determination of value.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if the court determines that the property that is the subject of a partition action is heirs property, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property by ordering an appraisal under subsection (d).(b) Agreement by cotenants.--If all cotenants have agreed to the value of the property or to another method of valuation, the court shall adopt that value or the value produced by the agreed method of valuation.(c) When determined by court.--If the court determines that the evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by the cost of the appraisal, the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.(d) Appointment of appraiser.--If the court orders an appraisal, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate appraiser licensed in this Commonwealth to determine the fair market value of the property assuming sole ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of the appraisal, the appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the court.(e) Notice.--If an appraisal is conducted under subsection (d), not later than 10 days after the appraisal is filed, the court shall send notice to each party with a known address, stating:(1) The appraised fair market value of the property.(2) That the appraisal is available at the clerk's office.(3) That a party may file with the court an objection to 20250SB0890PN1837 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the appraisal not later than 30 days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the objection.(f) Hearing.--If an appraisal is filed with the court under subsection (d), the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the fair market value of the property not sooner than 30 days after a copy of the notice of the appraisal is sent to each party under subsection (e), whether or not an objection to the appraisal is filed under subsection (e)(3). In addition to the court-ordered appraisal, the court may consider any other evidence of value offered by a party.(g) Posthearing determination and notice.--After a hearing under subsection (f), but before considering the merits of the partition action, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.§ 21A27. Cotenant buyout.(a) Initial notice to parties.--If a cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value under section 21A26 (relating to determination of value), the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.(b) Cotenant notice to court.--Not later than 45 days after the notice is sent under subsection (a), any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may give notice to the court that it elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.(c) Purchase price.--The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that requested partition by sale is the value of the entire parcel determined under section 21A26 20250SB0890PN1837 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 multiplied by the cotenant's fractional ownership of the entire parcel.(d) Subsequent court notice to parties.--After expiration of the period in subsection (b), the following rules apply:(1) If only one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall notify all the parties of that fact.(2) If more than one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall allocate the right to buy those interests among the electing cotenants based on each electing cotenant's existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants electing to buy and send notice to all the parties of that fact and of the price to be paid by each electing cotenant.(3) If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall send notice to all the parties of that fact and resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) (relating to partition alternatives).(e) Payment and effect.--If the court sends notice to the parties under subsection (d)(1) or (2), the court shall set a date, not sooner than 60 days after the date the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants must pay their apportioned price into the court. In determining an appropriate date by which electing cotenants must pay their apportioned price into the court, the court shall consider the time necessary to obtain financing and may extend the deadline upon request. After this date, the following rules apply:20250SB0890PN1837 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If all electing cotenants timely pay their apportioned price into court, the court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons entitled to them.(2) If no electing cotenant timely pays its apportioned price, the court shall resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.(3) If one or more but not all of the electing cotenants fail to pay their apportioned price on time, the court shall give notice to the electing cotenants that paid their apportioned price of the interest remaining and the price for all that interest.(f) Purchase of remaining interest.--Not later than 20 days after the court gives notice under subsection (e)(3), a cotenant that paid may elect to purchase all of the remaining interest by paying the entire price into the court. After the 20-day period, the following rules apply:(1) If only one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall issue an order reallocating the remaining interest to that cotenant. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating the interests of all of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them.(2) If no cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.20250SB0890PN1837 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If more than one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest among those paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant's original fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total original fractional ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the remaining interest. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating all of the cotenants' interests, disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court.(g) Request to authorize sale.--Not later than 45 days after the court sends notice to the parties under subsection (a), a cotenant entitled to buy an interest under this section may request the court to authorize the sale as part of the pending action of the interests of cotenants named as defendants and served with the complaint but that did not appear in the action.(h) Denial of request or authorization of sale.--If the court receives a timely request under subsection (g), the court, after hearing, may deny the request or authorize the requested additional sale on such terms as the court determines to be fair and reasonable, subject to the following limitations:(1) A sale authorized under this subsection may occur only after the purchase prices for all interests subject to sale under subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) have been paid into court and those interests have been reallocated among the cotenants as provided in those subsections.(2) The purchase price for the interest of a nonappearing cotenant is based on the court's determination of value under section 21A28.20250SB0890PN1837 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 21A28. Partition alternatives.(a) Partition in kind.--If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not purchased by other cotenants under section 21A27 (relating to cotenant buyout) or if, after conclusion of the buyout under section 21A27, a cotenant remains that has requested partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the court, after consideration of the factors listed in section 21A29 (relating to considerations for partition in kind), finds that partition in kind will result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group. In considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a request by two or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.(b) Partition by sale or dismissal of action.--If the court does not order partition in kind under subsection (a), the court shall order partition by sale under section 21A30 (relating to open-market sale, sealed bids or auction) or, if no cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall dismiss the action.(c) Payments.--If the court orders partition in kind under subsection (a), the court may require that one or more cotenants pay one or more other cotenants amounts so that the payments, taken together with the value of the in-kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the partition in kind just and proportionate in value to the fractional interests held.(d) Allocation of interests among unknown, unlocatable or defaulting cotenants.--If the court orders partition in kind, the court shall allocate to the cotenants that are unknown, unlocatable or the subject of a default judgment, if their interests were not bought out under section 21A27, a part of the property representing the combined interests of these cotenants 20250SB0890PN1837 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as determined by the court and this part of the property shall remain undivided.§ 21A29. Considerations for partition in kind.(a) Prejudice determination.--In determining under section 21A28(a) (relating to partition alternatives) whether partition in kind would result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court shall consider the following:(1) whether the heirs property practicably can be divided among the cotenants;(2) whether partition in kind would apportion the property in such a way that the aggregate fair market value of the parcels resulting from the division would be materially less than the value of the property if it were sold as a whole, taking into account the condition under which a court-ordered sale likely would occur;(3) evidence of the collective duration of ownership or possession of the property by a cotenant and one or more predecessors in title or predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives of the cotenant or each other;(4) a cotenant's sentimental attachment to the property, including any attachment arising because the property has ancestral or other unique or special value to the cotenant;(5) the lawful use being made of the property by a cotenant and the degree to which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant could not continue the same use of the property;(6) the degree to which the cotenants have contributed their pro rata share of the property taxes, insurance and other expenses associated with maintaining ownership of the 20250SB0890PN1837 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property or have contributed to the physical improvement, maintenance or upkeep of the property; and(7) any other relevant factor.(b) Weighing totality of considerations.--The court may not consider any one factor in subsection (a) to be dispositive without weighing the totality of all relevant factors and circumstances.§ 21A30. Open-market sale, sealed bids or auction.(a) Sale requirements.--If the court orders a sale of heirs property, the sale must be an open-market sale unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids or an auction would be more economically advantageous and in the best interest of the cotenants as a group.(b) Appointment of broker.--If the court orders an open-market sale and the parties, not later than 10 days after the entry of the order, agree on a real estate broker licensed in this Commonwealth to offer the property for sale, the court shall appoint the broker and establish a reasonable commission. If the parties do not agree on a broker, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate broker licensed in this Commonwealth to offer the property for sale and shall establish a reasonable commission. The broker shall offer the property for sale in a commercially reasonable manner at a price no lower than the determination of value and on the terms and conditions established by the court.(c) Offer to purchase obtained.--If the broker appointed under subsection (b) obtains within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value:(1) The broker shall comply with the reporting 20250SB0890PN1837 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements in section 21A31 (relating to report of open-market sale).(2) The sale may be completed in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.(d) Options to court when no offer obtained.--If the broker appointed under subsection (b) does not obtain within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value, the court, after hearing, may:(1) approve the highest outstanding offer, if any;(2) redetermine the value of the property and order that the property continue to be offered for an additional time; or(3) order that the property be sold by sealed bids or at an auction.(e) Sale by sealed bid or auction.--If the court orders a sale by sealed bids or an auction, the court shall set terms and conditions of the sale. If the court orders an auction, the auction must be conducted under 68 Pa.C.S. § 2306(c) (relating to effect of certification of vacancy and abandonment).(f) Purchaser credit authorized.--If a purchaser is entitled to a share of the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser is entitled to a credit against the price in an amount equal to the purchaser's share of the proceeds.§ 21A31. Report of open-market sale.(a) Duty of broker.--Unless required to do so within a shorter time, a broker appointed under section 21A30(b) (relating to open-market sale, sealed bids or auction) to offer heirs property for open-market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven days after receiving an offer to purchase the property for at least the value determined under 20250SB0890PN1837 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 21A26 (relating to determination of value) or 21A30.(b) Content of report.--The report required by subsection (a) shall contain the following information:(1) A description of the property to be sold to each buyer.(2) The name of each buyer.(3) The proposed purchase price.(4) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any owner financing.(5) The amount to be paid to lienholders.(6) A statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the broker's commission.(7) Other material facts relevant to the sale.§ 21A32. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.§ 21A33. Relation to Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act.(a) General rule.--Except as provided for in subsection (b), this chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.).(b) Exceptions.--(1) This chapter does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)).(2) This chapter does not authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 20250SB0890PN1837 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).CHAPTER 21BUNIFORM REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER ON DEATHSEC.21B01. SHORT TITLE OF CHAPTER.21B02. DEFINITIONS.21B03. APPLICABILITY.21B04. NONEXCLUSIVITY.21B05. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED AUTHORIZED.21B06. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED REVOCABLE.21B07. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED NONTESTAMENTARY.21B08. CAPACITY OF TRANSFEROR.21B09. REQUIREMENTS.21B10. NOTICE, DELIVERY, ACCEPTANCE AND CONSIDERATION NOT REQUIRED.21B11. REVOCATION.21B12. EFFECT OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED DURING TRANSFEROR'S LIFE.21B13. EFFECT OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED ON TRANSFEROR'S DEATH OR DIVORCE.21B14. SLAYER OR ELDER ABUSER.21B15. DISCLAIMER.21B16. SIMULTANEOUS DEATH.21B17. ELECTIVE SHARE.21B18. LIABILITY FOR CREDITOR CLAIMS AND STATUTORY ALLOWANCES.21B19. WARNING.21B20. OPTIONAL FORM OF DEED.21B21. OPTIONAL FORM OF REVOCATION.21B22. PRIOR DEEDS.§ 21B01. SHORT TITLE OF CHAPTER.20250SB0890PN1837 - 18 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE UNIFORM REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER ON DEATH ACT.§ 21B02. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"BENEFICIARY." A PERSON THAT RECEIVES PROPERTY UNDER A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED."DESIGNATED ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY." A PERSON THAT RECEIVES PROPERTY UNDER A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED WHEN THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY PREDECEASES THE TRANSFEROR."DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY." A PERSON DESIGNATED TO RECEIVE PROPERTY IN A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED."JOINT OWNER." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OWNS PROPERTY CONCURRENTLY WITH ONE OR MORE OTHER INDIVIDUALS WITH A RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP. THE TERM INCLUDES A JOINT TENANT, OWNER OF PROPERTY WITH A RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP AND TENANT BY THE ENTIRETY. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A TENANT IN COMMON."LAPSE." WHEN A DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY PREDECEASES A TRANSFEROR AND NO DESIGNATED ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY IS NAMED."PERSON." AN INDIVIDUAL, CORPORATION, BUSINESS TRUST, ESTATE, TRUST, PARTNERSHIP, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, ASSOCIATION, JOINT VENTURE, PUBLIC CORPORATION, GOVERNMENT OR GOVERNMENTAL SUBDIVISION, AGENCY OR INSTRUMENTALITY OR ANY OTHER LEGAL OR COMMERCIAL ENTITY."PROPERTY." AN INTEREST IN REAL PROPERTY LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WHICH IS TRANSFERABLE ON THE DEATH OF THE OWNER."TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED." A DEED AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS CHAPTER."TRANSFEROR." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAKES A TRANSFER ON DEATH 20250SB0890PN1837 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEED.§ 21B03. APPLICABILITY.THIS CHAPTER APPLIES TO A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED MADE BEFORE, ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION BY A TRANSFEROR DYING ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.§ 21B04. NONEXCLUSIVITY.THIS CHAPTER DOES NOT AFFECT ANY METHOD OF TRANSFERRING PROPERTY OTHERWISE PERMITTED UNDER THE LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.§ 21B05. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED AUTHORIZED.AN INDIVIDUAL MAY TRANSFER PROPERTY TO ONE OR MORE BENEFICIARIES EFFECTIVE AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH BY A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED. THE TRANSFER MAY BE MADE TO A CUSTODIAN UNDER CHAPTER 53 (RELATING TO PENNSYLVANIA UNIFORM TRANSFERS TO MINORS ACT).§ 21B06. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED REVOCABLE.A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS REVOCABLE EVEN IF THE DEED OR ANOTHER INSTRUMENT CONTAINS A CONTRARY PROVISION.§ 21B07. TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED NONTESTAMENTARY.A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS NONTESTAMENTARY.§ 21B08. CAPACITY OF TRANSFEROR.THE CAPACITY REQUIRED TO MAKE OR REVOKE A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS THE SAME AS THE CAPACITY REQUIRED TO MAKE A WILL.§ 21B09. REQUIREMENTS.A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED:(1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2), MUST CONTAIN THE ESSENTIAL ELEMENTS AND FORMALITIES OF A PROPERLY RECORDABLE DEED;(2) MUST STATE THAT THE TRANSFER TO THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY IS TO OCCUR AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH; AND(3) MUST BE RECORDED BEFORE THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH IN 20250SB0890PN1837 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE PUBLIC RECORDS IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.§ 21B10. NOTICE, DELIVERY, ACCEPTANCE AND CONSIDERATION NOT REQUIRED.A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS EFFECTIVE WITHOUT:(1) NOTICE OR DELIVERY TO OR ACCEPTANCE BY THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DURING THE TRANSFEROR'S LIFE; OR(2) CONSIDERATION.§ 21B11. REVOCATION.(A) REVOCATION AUTHORIZED.--SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B), AN INSTRUMENT IS EFFECTIVE TO REVOKE A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED RECORDED AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 21B09(3) (RELATING TO REQUIREMENTS), OR ANY PART OF IT, ONLY IF THE INSTRUMENT:(1) IS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED THAT REVOKES THE DEED OR PART OF THE DEED EXPRESSLY OR BY INCONSISTENCY;(II) AN INSTRUMENT OF REVOCATION THAT EXPRESSLY REVOKES THE DEED OR PART OF THE DEED; OR(III) A DEED THAT REVOKES THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED OR PART OF THE DEED EXPRESSLY OR BY INCONSISTENCY; AND(2) IS ACKNOWLEDGED BY THE TRANSFEROR AFTER THE ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED BEING REVOKED AND RECORDED BEFORE THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS RECORDED.(B) MORE THAN ONE TRANSFEROR.--IF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS MADE BY MORE THAN ONE TRANSFEROR, THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) REVOCATION BY A TRANSFEROR DOES NOT AFFECT THE DEED AS TO THE INTEREST OF ANOTHER TRANSFEROR; AND(2) A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED MADE BY JOINT OWNERS IS 20250SB0890PN1837 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REVOKED ONLY IF IT IS REVOKED BY ALL THE LIVING JOINT OWNERS.(C) TRANSFER NOT LIMITED.--THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT A TRANSFEROR'S ABILITY TO TRANSFER THE PROPERTY DURING THE TRANSFEROR'S LIFE.§ 21B12. EFFECT OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED DURING TRANSFEROR'S LIFE.(A) GENERAL RULE.--DURING A TRANSFEROR'S LIFE, A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED DOES NOT:(1) AFFECT AN INTEREST OR RIGHT OF THE TRANSFEROR OR ANY OTHER OWNER, INCLUDING THE RIGHT TO TRANSFER OR ENCUMBER THE PROPERTY;(2) AFFECT AN INTEREST OR RIGHT OF A TRANSFEREE, EVEN IF THE TRANSFEREE HAS ACTUAL OR CONSTRUCTIVE NOTICE OF THE DEED;(3) AFFECT AN INTEREST OR RIGHT OF A SECURED OR UNSECURED CREDITOR OR FUTURE CREDITOR OF THE TRANSFEROR, EVEN IF THE CREDITOR HAS ACTUAL OR CONSTRUCTIVE NOTICE OF THE DEED;(4) CONFER ANY INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY TO THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OR AFFECT THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY'S ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY PUBLIC BENEFIT;(5) CREATE A LEGAL OR EQUITABLE INTEREST IN FAVOR OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY; OR(6) SUBJECT THE PROPERTY TO CLAIMS OR PROCESS OF A CREDITOR OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY.(B) NOT AN ASSET TRANSFER.--DURING A TRANSFEROR'S LIFE, A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED SHALL NOT BE DEEMED AN ASSET TRANSFER OF THE PROPERTY FOR ASSESSING THE TRANSFEROR'S ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY PUBLIC BENEFIT.§ 21B13. EFFECT OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED ON TRANSFEROR'S DEATH OR DIVORCE.20250SB0890PN1837 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) DEATH OF TRANSFEROR.--EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED OR THIS SECTION, ON THE DEATH OF THE TRANSFEROR, THE FOLLOWING RULES APPLY TO PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED AND OWNED BY THE TRANSFEROR AT DEATH:(1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2), THE INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY IS TRANSFERRED TO THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE DEED.(2) THE INTEREST OF A DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY IS CONTINGENT ON THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY SURVIVING THE TRANSFEROR. THE INTEREST OF A DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY THAT FAILS TO SURVIVE THE TRANSFEROR LAPSES. IF THERE ARE MULTIPLE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES, THE EFFECT OF A LAPSE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH RESULTS IN THE TRANSFER OF THE INTEREST OF THE DECEASED DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY TO THE SURVIVING BENEFICIARIES. IF ALL DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES PREDECEASE THE TRANSFEROR, THE BENEFICIARIES' INTERESTS TERMINATE AND THE PROPERTY PASSES WITH THE TRANSFEROR'S ESTATE.(3) IF THE TRANSFEROR HAS IDENTIFIED TWO OR MORE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES TO RECEIVE CONCURRENT INTERESTS IN THE PROPERTY, AND THE SHARE OF ONE OR MORE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES LAPSES OR FAILS FOR ANY REASON, THE SHARE OR SHARES SHALL BE TRANSFERRED TO THE REMAINING DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES IN PROPORTION TO THE INTEREST OF EACH IN THE REMAINING PART OF THE PROPERTY HELD CONCURRENTLY.(4) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3), CONCURRENT INTERESTS ARE TRANSFERRED TO THE BENEFICIARIES IN EQUAL AND UNDIVIDED SHARES WITH NO RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP.(B) DIVORCE.--IF THE TRANSFEROR AND DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY ARE MARRIED TO EACH OTHER WHEN THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS 20250SB0890PN1837 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MADE, THE FOLLOWING RULES APPLY:(1) IF A DIVORCE DECREE IS ISSUED AFTER THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED WAS MADE AND NO DEED WAS RECORDED SUBSEQUENT TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE DECREE, SECTION 2507(2) (RELATING TO MODIFICATION OF CIRCUMSTANCES) SHALL APPLY TO THE INTEREST OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY AS IF THE TRANSFER OF THE PROPERTY WAS A BEQUEST IN THE TRANSFEROR'S WILL.(2) IF THE TRANSFEROR DIES BEFORE THE ISSUANCE OF A DIVORCE DECREE, SECTION 2507(2) SHALL APPLY TO THE INTEREST OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY AS IF THE TRANSFER OF THE PROPERTY WAS A BEQUEST IN THE TRANSFEROR'S WILL.(C) BENEFICIARY SUBJECT TO INTERESTS.--SUBJECT TO SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 24, 1931 (P.L.48, NO.40), ENTITLED "AN ACT REQUIRING THE RECORDING OF CERTAIN WRITTEN AGREEMENTS PERTAINING TO REAL PROPERTY, AND PRESCRIBING THE EFFECT THEREOF AS TO SUBSEQUENT PURCHASERS, MORTGAGEES, AND JUDGMENT CREDITORS OF THE PARTIES THERETO," A BENEFICIARY TAKES THE PROPERTY SUBJECT TO ALL CONVEYANCES, ENCUMBRANCES, ASSIGNMENTS, CONTRACTS, MORTGAGES, LIENS AND OTHER INTERESTS TO WHICH THE PROPERTY IS SUBJECT AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 24, 1931 (P.L.48, NO.40), THE RECORDING OF THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS DEEMED TO HAVE OCCURRED AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH.(D) JOINT OWNERS.--(1) IF A TRANSFEROR IS A JOINT OWNER WHO DIES AND:(I) IS SURVIVED BY ONE OR MORE OTHER JOINT OWNERS, THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED BELONGS TO THE SURVIVING JOINT OWNER OR OWNERS WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP; OR(II) IS THE LAST SURVIVING JOINT OWNER, THE PROPERTY 20250SB0890PN1837 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED BELONGS TO THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OR BENEFICIARIES.(2) IF THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED IS HELD AS TENANTS BY THE ENTIRETIES AND BECOMES PROPERTY HELD BY TENANTS IN COMMON UNDER OTHER LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AS A RESULT OF THE DIVORCE OF THE JOINT OWNERS, THE INTEREST OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY OR BENEFICIARIES LAPSES.(E) NO COVENANT OR WARRANTY OF TITLE.--NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF ANY OTHER LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED TRANSFERS PROPERTY WITHOUT COVENANT OR WARRANTY OF TITLE EVEN IF THE DEED CONTAINS A CONTRARY PROVISION.(F) EXEMPT FROM REALTY TRANSFER TAX.--A TRANSFER OF PROPERTY PURSUANT TO A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE STATE AND LOCAL REALTY TRANSFER TAX UNDER ARTICLES XI-C AND XI-D OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, SECTION 301.1 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, NO.511), KNOWN AS THE LOCAL TAX ENABLING ACT, AND THE ACT OF AUGUST 5, 1932 (SP.SESS., P.L.45, NO.45), REFERRED TO AS THE STERLING ACT.(G) DUE-ON-SALE PROVISIONS.--A LENDER SHALL NOT EXERCISE A DUE-ON-SALE CLAUSE UPON A TRANSFER ON DEATH UNDER THIS CHAPTER TO THE EXTENT PROHIBITED BY 12 U.S.C. § 1701J-3(D) (RELATING TO PREEMPTION OF DUE-ON-SALE PROHIBITIONS) OR OTHER LAW.§ 21B14. SLAYER OR ELDER ABUSER.A SLAYER OR ELDER ABUSER AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8801 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) OF A TRANSFEROR SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE PREDECEASED THE TRANSFEROR AS TO PROPERTY WHICH WOULD HAVE PASSED TO THE SLAYER OR ELDER ABUSER THROUGH A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED.20250SB0890PN1837 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 21B15. DISCLAIMER.A BENEFICIARY MAY DISCLAIM ALL OR PART OF THE BENEFICIARY'S INTEREST IN PROPERTY TO BE TRANSFERRED UNDER A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED BY RECORDING A DISCLAIMER UNDER CHAPTER 62 (RELATING TO DISCLAIMERS). AN INTEREST THAT IS DISCLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION IS DEEMED TO HAVE LAPSED.§ 21B16. SIMULTANEOUS DEATH.IF ALL TRANSFERORS AND DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES DIE SIMULTANEOUSLY, THE PROPERTY TO BE TRANSFERRED UNDER A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED SHALL VEST IN THE ESTATES OF THE DESIGNATED BENEFICIARIES.§ 21B17. ELECTIVE SHARE.PROPERTY TRANSFERRED UNDER A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED SHALL BE CONSIDERED PART OF THE TRANSFEROR'S PROBATE ESTATE FOR PURPOSES OF A SPOUSE'S RIGHT TO AN ELECTIVE SHARE UNDER CHAPTER 22 (RELATING TO ELECTIVE SHARE OF SURVIVING SPOUSE).§ 21B18. LIABILITY FOR CREDITOR CLAIMS AND STATUTORY ALLOWANCES.(A) ENFORCEMENT BY PROBATE ESTATE.--TO THE EXTENT A TRANSFEROR'S PROBATE ESTATE IS INSUFFICIENT TO SATISFY AN ALLOWED CLAIM AGAINST THE ESTATE OR A STATUTORY ALLOWANCE TO A SURVIVING SPOUSE, THE ESTATE MAY ENFORCE THE LIABILITY AGAINST PROPERTY TRANSFERRED AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH BY A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED.(B) APPORTIONMENT.--IF MORE THAN ONE PROPERTY IS TRANSFERRED BY ONE OR MORE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEEDS, THE LIABILITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) IS APPORTIONED AMONG THE PROPERTIES IN PROPORTION TO THEIR NET VALUES AT THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH.(C) PROCEEDING TO ENFORCE.--A PROCEEDING TO ENFORCE THE LIABILITY UNDER THIS SECTION MUST BE COMMENCED NOT LATER THAN 18 20250SB0890PN1837 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MONTHS AFTER THE TRANSFEROR'S DEATH.§ 21B19. WARNING.(A) REQUIREMENT.--A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED SHALL CONTAIN THE FOLLOWING WARNINGS:WARNING: THE PROPERTY TRANSFERRED REMAINS SUBJECT TO INHERITANCE TAXATION IN PENNSYLVANIA TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT IT WOULD IF THE TRANSFEROR DID NOT EXECUTE THIS TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED. FAILURE TO TIMELY PAY INHERITANCE TAXES IS SUBJECT TO INTEREST AND PENALTIES AS PROVIDED BY LAW.WARNING: THE PROPERTY TRANSFERRED REMAINS SUBJECT TO CLAIMS FOR MEDICAID ESTATE RECOVERY REIMBURSEMENT TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO DISCHARGE ANY SUCH CLAIM REMAINING AFTER APPLICATION OF THE ASSETS OF THE TRANSFEROR'S ESTATE.WARNING: IF YOUR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DIES BEFORE YOU, THE PROPERTY WILL NOT TRANSFER TO THEM. IF YOUR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DIES BEFORE YOU, YOU MAY WISH TO REDO THIS DEED OR CONSULT A LAWYER.(B) VALIDITY.--A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED RECORDED AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 21B09(3) (RELATING TO REQUIREMENTS) SHALL BE VALID NOTWITHSTANDING THE EXISTENCE OF ANY DEFECTS IN THE WORDING OF THE WARNINGS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION OR FOR FAILURE TO INCLUDE ANY WARNING.§ 21B20. OPTIONAL FORM OF DEED.THE FOLLOWING FORM MAY BE USED TO CREATE A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED. THE OTHER SECTIONS OF THIS CHAPTER GOVERN THE EFFECT OF THIS OR ANY OTHER INSTRUMENT USED TO CREATE A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED:(FRONT OF FORM)REVOCABLE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEEDNOTICE TO OWNER20250SB0890PN1837 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 YOU SHOULD CAREFULLY READ ALL INFORMATION ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THIS FORM. YOU MAY WANT TO CONSULT A LAWYER BEFORE USING THIS FORM.THIS FORM MUST BE RECORDED BEFORE YOUR DEATH, OR IT WILL NOT BE EFFECTIVE.IDENTIFYING INFORMATIONOWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS DEED:___________________________ ______________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESS___________________________ ______________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESSLEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY: __________________________________________________________________________________________DESIGNATED BENEFICIARYI DESIGNATE THE FOLLOWING BENEFICIARY IF THE BENEFICIARY SURVIVES ME.____________________ ________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESSRELATIONSHIP TO OWNER OR OWNERS - OPTIONALDESIGNATED ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY - OPTIONALIF MY PRIMARY BENEFICIARY DOES NOT SURVIVE ME, I DESIGNATE THE FOLLOWING ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY IF THAT BENEFICIARY SURVIVES ME.____________________ ________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESSRELATIONSHIP TO OWNER OR OWNERS - OPTIONALTRANSFER ON DEATHAT MY DEATH, I TRANSFER MY INTEREST IN THE DESCRIBED PROPERTY TO THE BENEFICIARIES AS DESIGNATED ABOVE.BEFORE MY DEATH, I HAVE THE RIGHT TO REVOKE THIS DEED.20250SB0890PN1837 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS DEED_______________________________ (SEAL)________________SIGNATURE DATE_______________________________ (SEAL)_________________SIGNATURE DATEWARNING: THE PROPERTY TRANSFERRED REMAINS SUBJECT TO INHERITANCE TAXATION IN PENNSYLVANIA TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT IT WOULD IF THE TRANSFEROR DID NOT EXECUTE THIS TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED. FAILURE TO TIMELY PAY INHERITANCE TAXES IS SUBJECT TO INTEREST AND PENALTIES AS PROVIDED BY LAW.WARNING: THE PROPERTY TRANSFERRED REMAINS SUBJECT TO CLAIMS FOR MEDICAID ESTATE RECOVERY REIMBURSEMENT TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO DISCHARGE ANY SUCH CLAIM REMAINING AFTER APPLICATION OF THE ASSETS OF THE TRANSFEROR'S ESTATE.WARNING: IF YOUR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DIES BEFORE YOU, THE PROPERTY WILL NOT TRANSFER TO THEM. IF YOUR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY DIES BEFORE YOU, YOU MAY WISH TO REDO THIS DEED OR CONSULT A LAWYER.ACKNOWLEDGMENT(INSERT ACKNOWLEDGMENT FOR DEED HERE)(BACK OF FORM)COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORMWHAT DOES THE TRANSFER ON DEATH (TOD) DEED DO? WHEN YOU DIE, THIS DEED TRANSFERS THE DESCRIBED PROPERTY, SUBJECT TO ANY LIENS OR MORTGAGES (OR OTHER ENCUMBRANCES) ON THE PROPERTY AT YOUR DEATH. PROBATE IS NOT REQUIRED. THE TOD DEED HAS NO EFFECT UNTIL YOU DIE. YOU CAN REVOKE IT AT ANY TIME. YOU ARE ALSO FREE TO TRANSFER THE PROPERTY TO SOMEONE ELSE DURING YOUR LIFETIME. IF YOU DO NOT OWN ANY INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY WHEN YOU DIE, THIS DEED WILL HAVE NO EFFECT.20250SB0890PN1837 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HOW DO I MAKE A TOD DEED? COMPLETE THIS FORM OR DRAFT A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED ON YOUR OWN OR WITH LEGAL ASSISTANCE. HAVE IT ACKNOWLEDGED (NOTARIZED) BEFORE A NOTARY PUBLIC. RECORD THE FORM IN EACH COUNTY WHERE ANY PART OF THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. THE FORM HAS NO EFFECT UNLESS IT IS ACKNOWLEDGED (NOTARIZED) AND RECORDED BEFORE YOUR DEATH.IS THE "LEGAL DESCRIPTION" OF THE PROPERTY NECESSARY? YES.HOW DO I FIND THE "LEGAL DESCRIPTION" OF THE PROPERTY? THIS INFORMATION MAY BE ON THE DEED YOU RECEIVED WHEN YOU BECAME AN OWNER OF THE PROPERTY. THIS INFORMATION IS ALSO AVAILABLE IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. IT IS VERY IMPORTANT TO OBTAIN THE PROPER "LEGAL DESCRIPTION" OF THE PROPERTY. IF YOU ARE NOT ABSOLUTELY SURE, CONSULT A LAWYER.CAN I CHANGE MY MIND BEFORE I RECORD THE TOD DEED? YES. IF YOU HAVE NOT YET RECORDED THE DEED AND WANT TO CHANGE YOUR MIND, SIMPLY TEAR UP OR OTHERWISE DESTROY THE DEED.HOW DO I "RECORD" THE TOD DEED? TAKE THE COMPLETED AND ACKNOWLEDGED FORM TO THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. FOLLOW THE INSTRUCTIONS GIVEN BY THE COUNTY RECORDER TO MAKE THE FORM PART OF THE OFFICIAL PROPERTY RECORDS. IF THE PROPERTY IS IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY, YOU SHOULD RECORD THE DEED IN EACH COUNTY.DOES THE TOD DEED ALLOW MY BENEFICIARY TO AVOID INHERITANCE TAXES, MEDICAID ESTATE RECOVERY OR OTHER DEBTS I MAY HAVE? NO. YOUR BENEFICIARY IS STILL RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING THAT YOUR DEBTS ARE PAID, INCLUDING INHERITANCE TAXES AND MEDICAID ESTATE RECOVERY.CAN I LATER REVOKE THE TOD DEED IF I CHANGE MY MIND? YES. YOU CAN REVOKE THE TOD DEED. NO ONE, INCLUDING THE 20250SB0890PN1837 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BENEFICIARIES, CAN PREVENT YOU FROM REVOKING THE DEED.HOW DO I REVOKE THE TOD DEED AFTER IT IS RECORDED? THERE ARE THREE WAYS TO REVOKE A RECORDED TOD DEED:(1) COMPLETE AND ACKNOWLEDGE A REVOCATION FORM AND RECORD IT IN EACH COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.(2) COMPLETE AND ACKNOWLEDGE A NEW TOD DEED THAT DISPOSES OF THE SAME PROPERTY AND RECORD IT IN EACH COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.(3) RECORD A DEED THAT TRANSFERS THE PROPERTY TO SOMEONE ELSE DURING YOUR LIFETIME. YOU MAY NOT REVOKE THE TOD DEED IN YOUR WILL.I AM BEING PRESSURED TO COMPLETE THIS FORM. WHAT SHOULD I DO? DO NOT COMPLETE THIS FORM UNDER PRESSURE. SEEK HELP FROM A TRUSTED FAMILY MEMBER, FRIEND OR LAWYER. YOU MAY BE ABLE TO GET FREE LEGAL ADVICE FROM A LEGAL SERVICES ORGANIZATION.DO I NEED TO TELL THE BENEFICIARIES ABOUT THE TOD DEED? NO, BUT IT IS RECOMMENDED. SECRECY CAN CAUSE LATER COMPLICATIONS AND MIGHT MAKE IT EASIER FOR OTHERS TO COMMIT FRAUD.I HAVE OTHER QUESTIONS ABOUT THIS FORM. WHAT SHOULD I DO? THIS FORM IS DESIGNED TO FIT SOME BUT NOT ALL SITUATIONS. IF YOU HAVE OTHER QUESTIONS, YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO CONSULT A LAWYER. YOU MAY BE ABLE TO GET FREE LEGAL ADVICE FROM A LEGAL SERVICES ORGANIZATION.§ 21B21. OPTIONAL FORM OF REVOCATION.THE FOLLOWING FORM MAY BE USED TO CREATE AN INSTRUMENT OF REVOCATION OF A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED. THE OTHER SECTIONS OF THIS CHAPTER GOVERN THE EFFECT OF THIS OR ANY OTHER INSTRUMENT USED TO REVOKE A TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED.(FRONT OF FORM)REVOCATION OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED20250SB0890PN1837 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOTICE TO OWNERTHIS REVOCATION MUST BE RECORDED BEFORE YOU DIE OR IT WILL NOT BE EFFECTIVE.IF YOU ARE THE ONLY OWNER OF THIS PROPERTY, THIS REVOCATION FORM VOIDS THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED(S) YOU HAVE PREVIOUSLY SIGNED AND RECORDED, AS LONG AS YOU PROPERLY COMPLETE THIS REVOCATION FORM AND RECORD IT BEFORE YOUR DEATH.IF YOU OWN THIS PROPERTY AS A "TENANT IN COMMON" WITH OTHER PEOPLE, THIS REVOCATION FORM VOIDS ONLY YOUR PROPORTIONAL INTEREST IN THE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED(S) YOU HAVE PREVIOUSLY SIGNED AND RECORDED, AS LONG AS YOU PROPERLY COMPLETE THIS REVOCATION FORM AND RECORD IT BEFORE YOUR DEATH.IF YOU OWN THIS PROPERTY AS A "JOINT TENANT" OR AS A "TENANT BY THE ENTIRETY" WITH ANOTHER PERSON(S) WHO IS STILL ALIVE, THIS REVOCATION IS NOT VALID UNLESS THOSE OTHER LIVING PERSON(S) ALSO SIGN THE REVOCATION FORM.IDENTIFYING INFORMATIONOWNER OR OWNERS OF PROPERTY MAKING THIS REVOCATION:___________________________ ______________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESS___________________________ ______________________________PRINTED NAME MAILING ADDRESSLEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY: __________________________________________________________________________________________REVOCATIONI REVOKE ALL MY PREVIOUS TRANSFERS OF THIS PROPERTY BY TRANSFER ON DEATH DEED.SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS REVOCATION_______________________________ (SEAL)_________________SIGNATURE DATE20250SB0890PN1837 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 _______________________________ (SEAL)________________SIGNATURE DATEACKNOWLEDGMENT(INSERT ACKNOWLEDGMENT HERE)(BACK OF FORM)COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORMHOW DO I USE THIS FORM TO REVOKE A TRANSFER ON DEATH (TOD) DEED? COMPLETE THIS FORM. HAVE IT ACKNOWLEDGED (NOTARIZED) BEFORE A NOTARY PUBLIC OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO TAKE ACKNOWLEDGMENTS. RECORD THE FORM IN THE PUBLIC RECORDS IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS OF EACH COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. THE FORM MUST BE ACKNOWLEDGED (NOTARIZED) AND RECORDED BEFORE YOUR DEATH OR IT HAS NO EFFECT.HOW DO I FIND THE "LEGAL DESCRIPTION" OF THE PROPERTY? THIS INFORMATION MAY BE ON THE TOD DEED. IT MAY ALSO BE AVAILABLE IN THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. IF YOU ARE NOT ABSOLUTELY SURE, CONSULT A LAWYER.HOW DO I "RECORD" THE FORM? TAKE THE COMPLETED AND ACKNOWLEDGED (NOTARIZED) FORM TO THE OFFICE OF THE COUNTY RECORDER OF DEEDS OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED. FOLLOW THE INSTRUCTIONS GIVEN BY THE COUNTY RECORDER TO MAKE THE FORM PART OF THE OFFICIAL PROPERTY RECORDS. IF THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY, YOU SHOULD RECORD THE FORM IN EACH OF THOSE COUNTIES.I AM BEING PRESSURED TO COMPLETE THIS FORM. WHAT SHOULD I DO? DO NOT COMPLETE THIS FORM UNDER PRESSURE. SEEK HELP FROM A TRUSTED FAMILY MEMBER, FRIEND OR LAWYER.I HAVE OTHER QUESTIONS ABOUT THIS FORM. WHAT SHOULD I DO? THIS FORM IS DESIGNED TO FIT SOME BUT NOT ALL SITUATIONS. IF YOU 20250SB0890PN1837 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HAVE OTHER QUESTIONS, CONSULT A LAWYER.§ 21B22. PRIOR DEEDS.THIS CHAPTER DOES NOT AFFECT THE VALIDITY OR EFFECT OF ANY DEED MADE PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF 20 PA.C.S. CH. 21A SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THE ADDITION OF 20 PA.C.S. CH. 21B SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 180 DAYS.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250SB0890PN1837 - 34 - <--123456789101112